Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.05, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Audit trail required. new text end new text begin (a) The responsible authority shall establish procedures to ensure that all actions in which not public data are created, received, changed, accessed, shared, or disseminated are recorded in a data audit trail. In addition, an audit trail must record: new text end new text begin (1) the date of the action; new text end new text begin (2) the identity of the person interacting with the data; new text end new text begin (3) for data received from another government entity or person, the identity of the sending government entity or person; and new text end new text begin (4) for data shared or disseminated outside the government entity, the identity of the receiving government entity or person. new text end new text begin (b) Data contained in an audit trail shall have the same classification as the underlying data tracked by the audit trail. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding section 138.17, an audit trail must be retained for not less than ten years or until the underlying data tracked by the audit trail is destroyed pursuant to the government entity's approved records retention schedule. new text end new text begin (d) This section does not supersede other audit trail requirements in state law. Any conflict between this subdivision and other audit trail requirements in state law shall be resolved pursuant to section 645.26, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning August 1, 2025. new text end